Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB515.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 301.2. Payment.(a) Methods.--A licensed eligible organization:(1) Must accept cash as a payment method for the playing of games of chance.(2) May accept a debit card as a payment method for the playing of games of chance.(b) Policies.--A licensed eligible organization may 123456789101112131415161718192021 establish its own policies concerning acceptance of checks, money orders and debit cards. A licensed eligible organization shall not be required to accept a check, money order or debit card.Section 2. The provisions of 61 Pa. Code § 901.506 are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 301.2 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0515PN0478 - 2 - 12345678